District of Columbia statutes.
50-705

Rules.

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-243, § 6, 38 DCR 355
Mar. 17, 1994, D.C. Law 10-78, § 2(c), 40 DCR 8464
Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-201, § 2(f), 41 DCR 7178
This section is referenced in § 50-703.
1981 Ed., § 40-2005.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Alternative Fuels of 1990 Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-232, March 17, 2003, law notification 40 DCR __.
Alternate Fuels Technology Act of 1990 Proposed Rules Disapproval Resolution of 1994: Pursuant to Resolution 10-259, effective January 14, 1995, the Council disapproved the proposed rules implementing the Alternative Fuels Technology Act of 1990.